Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.277

Violations—Attorney general—Cease and desist order—Temporary order.

If it appears to the attorney general that an entity has engaged or is about to engage in an act or practice constituting a violation of a provision of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, the attorney general may, in the attorney general's discretion, issue an order directing the entity to cease and desist from continuing the act or practice. Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given. The attorney general may issue a temporary order pending the hearing, which shall remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and which shall become final if the entity to whom the notice is addressed does not request a hearing within fifteen days after the receipt of the notice.

[ 2011 c 199 s 21; 1993 c 471 s 20.]